Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 5 Uniformity

29-11-40.
Promotion of uniformity.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-41.
Construction with federal law.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.

29-11-42.
Application.

This chapter shall apply to guardianship proceedings and conservatorship proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2016.

Articles 1, 3, and 4 of this chapter and Code Sections 29-11-40 and 29-11-41 shall apply to proceedings begun before July 1, 2016, regardless of whether a guardianship order or conservatorship order has been issued.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954.